Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 5.3 Incompetency to Stand Trial and Persons Adjudged Not Guilty by Reason of Insanity

40.1-5.3-1.
Facility for incompetent persons and others.

The state director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall maintain appropriate facilities, including the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital and the Eleanor Slater hospital, for the confinement of persons committed to the director’s custody pursuant to this chapter and shall provide for the proper care, treatment, and restraint of all such persons. All persons now or hereafter committed, pursuant to the provisions of §§

40.1-5.3-3

,

40.1-5.3-4

,

40.1-5.3-7

, or the provisions of prior law, shall be removed or committed, as the case may be, to the facility into the custody of the director, or the director’s designee, who in turn shall ensure the admission of the person to either the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital or the Eleanor Slater hospital in the discretion of the director or the director’s designee.

The cost of care, maintenance, and treatment of persons committed to the custody of the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, as provided in §§

40.1-5.3-3

and

40.1-5.3-4

, unless otherwise provided for, shall be paid by the person, if the person has any estate, or by the person liable for the person’s support, if such there be; otherwise, the director may maintain without charge or defray the expense of care and treatment of the poor or indigent persons incompetent to stand trial or acquitted on the grounds of insanity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 175, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

26-4-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5.3-2.
Transfers between state-operated hospitals.

Whenever any person committed, transferred, or removed to either the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital or the Eleanor Slater hospital to the facility provided for in §

40.1-5.3-1

shall have recovered his or her mental health sufficiently, the director may, upon request of the chief executive officer or the chief medical officer of either state-operated hospital, discharge the person from the first hospital and then admit the person to the general units of either the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital or Eleanor Slater hospital, as the case may be.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 175, § 2: G.L. 1956, § 26-4-2; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5.3-3.
Competency to stand trial.

Definitions. As used in this section:

“Attorney for the state” means the attorney general, an authorized assistant attorney general, or other person as may be authorized by law to act as a representative of the state in a criminal proceeding.

“Competent” or “competency” means mental ability to stand trial. A person is mentally competent to stand trial if he or she is able to understand the character and consequences of the proceedings against him or her and is able properly to assist in his or her defense.

“Department” means the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Director” means the director of the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Incompetent” or “incompetency” means mentally incompetent to stand trial. A person is mentally incompetent to stand trial if he or she is unable to understand the character and consequences of the proceedings against him or her or is unable properly to assist in his or her defense.

Presumption of competency. A defendant is presumed competent. The burden of proving that the defendant is not competent shall be by a preponderance of the evidence, and the burden of going forward with the evidence shall be on the party raising the issue. The burden of going forward shall be on the state if the court raises the issue.

Request for examination. If at any time during a criminal proceeding, prior to the imposition of sentence, it appears that the defendant is not competent, counsel for the defendant or the state, or the court, on its own motion, may request an examination to determine the defendant’s competency.

Examination of defendant.

If the court finds that the request for examination is justified, the court shall order an examination of the defendant. The scope of the examination shall be limited to the question of whether the defendant is competent.

The examination shall take place on an outpatient basis if the defendant is to be released on bail or recognizance. If the defendant is ordered confined at the adult correctional institutions, the examination shall take place at that facility. The department shall appoint or designate the physician(s) who will conduct the examinations.

If the defendant is ordered confined to the adult correctional institutions, the physician shall complete the examination within five (5) days. If the physician determines that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, the defendant shall be immediately transferred for admission to the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital or the Eleanor Slater hospital, pending the hearing provided for in subsection (g). At the discretion of the director, pending the hearing provided for in subsection (g), the defendant may be discharged from one state-operated hospital for the purpose of contemporaneously admitting the defendant to the other state-operated hospital pursuant to the procedures enumerated in §

40.1-5.3-2

.

Bail or recognizance during examination.

A defendant for whom a competency examination has been ordered shall be entitled to release on bail or recognizance to the same extent and on the same terms and conditions as if the issue of competency had not been raised.

The court may order the defendant to appear at a designated time and place for outpatient examination, and such an appearance may be made a condition of pretrial release.

Reports of examining physicians. Each examining physician shall prepare a report, in writing, in which the physician shall state the physician’s findings concerning the defendant’s competency, together with the medical and other data upon which the physician’s findings are based. The report shall be filed with the court within ten (10) business days if the defendant was ordered confined at the adult correctional institutions, and as soon as practicable if the defendant was released on bail or recognizance, and copies given to the attorney for the state and to the defendant or the defendant’s counsel.

Hearing. Upon receipt of the report and appropriate notice to the parties, the court shall hold a hearing unless the report concludes that the defendant is competent and the defendant and the attorney for the state in open court state their assent to the findings on the record. At the hearing, the report shall be introduced; other evidence bearing on the defendant’s competence may be introduced by the parties; and the defendant may testify, confront witnesses, and present evidence on the issue of the defendant’s competency. On the basis of the evidence introduced at the hearing, the court shall decide if the defendant is competent.

Commitment of the defendant.

If the court finds, after the hearing, that a defendant is competent, it shall proceed with the criminal case.

If the court finds that a defendant is incompetent, it shall commit him or her to the custody of the director for the purpose of determining whether or not the defendant is likely to imperil the peace and safety of the people of the state or the safety of himself or herself and whether the defendant will regain competency within the maximum period of any placement under this chapter.

Not later than fifteen (15) days from the date of the order of commitment, the director shall prepare and file with the court a written report in which the director shall state the director’s opinion regarding the defendant’s dangerousness; the likelihood of the defendant becoming competent to stand trial within the maximum period of any placement order; and the recommendations of the department regarding appropriate care and treatment of the defendant.

In the event the director is unable to complete the examination of the person in time to render the director’s report within the fifteen-day (15) period, the director shall report that fact, in writing, to the court with a statement of the reasons why the examination and report could not be completed within the prescribed period. A copy of the director’s statement shall be given to the attorney general and to the defendant, or the defendant’s counsel, any of whom may respond in writing, or if the court deems it appropriate, orally, to the director’s statement. The court may thereupon enter an order extending for an additional twenty (20) days the time in which the director is to file the director’s report.

Hearing.

Upon receipt of the report and appropriate notice to the director, the attorney general, and the defendant, or the defendant’s counsel, the court shall hold a hearing at which the report shall be introduced, other evidence bearing on the question of the mental condition of the person may be introduced by the parties, and the person may testify, confront witnesses, and present evidence.

If the court finds that a defendant who is incompetent may be placed on outpatient status without imperiling the peace or safety of the public or the safety of himself or herself, it may commit the defendant to an appropriate outpatient facility that agrees to provide treatment to the defendant and to adhere to the requirements of this section, in order that the defendant may receive treatment to restore or establish his or her competency.

If the court finds that a defendant who is incompetent is likely to imperil the peace or safety of the people of the state or the peace and safety of himself or herself, it may order the defendant to the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital or the Eleanor Slater hospital, pursuant to §

40.1-5.3-1

. A person who is ordered to be treated on inpatient status shall not be paroled, furloughed, placed on outpatient status or removed from a locked facility, or otherwise released from the institution where the person is being treated except upon petition to the court by the director, on notice to the attorney general and the defendant, or the defendant’s counsel, and after hearing thereon and entry of an order by a judge of the court authorizing release. The commitment ordered pursuant to this section shall terminate upon the occurrence of any of the following:

The defendant is determined by the court to be competent; or

The charges against the defendant are dismissed pursuant to subsection (j); or

The charges against the defendant are dismissed or a nolle prosequi is entered; or

The defendant is civilly committed pursuant to §

40.1-5-8

; or

The court finds there is no reasonable likelihood that in the foreseeable future the defendant will become competent and the defendant’s condition is such that the defendant cannot properly be committed under §

40.1-5-8

.

Period of commitment. When a court commits a defendant pursuant to subsection (i)(2) or (i)(3), it shall compute, counting from the date of entry to the order of commitment, the date of the expiration of the period of time equal to two thirds (2/3) of the maximum term of imprisonment for the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged. If the maximum term for the most serious offense charged is life imprisonment or death, the court shall, for the purpose of computation, deem the offense to be punishable by a maximum term of thirty (30) years. In the order of commitment, the court shall provide that if, on the date so computed, the defendant is still committed under the order, the charges against the defendant shall be dismissed.

Periodic review. The director shall petition the court to review the state of competency of a defendant committed pursuant to subsection (i)(2) or (i)(3) not later than six (6) months from the date of the order of commitment and every six (6) months thereafter, or when the director believes the defendant is no longer incompetent, whichever occurs first. Outpatient facilities that are providing treatment to defendants in accordance with subsection (i)(2) shall prepare reports to be submitted to the director in accordance with the requirements of this section. The director shall attach to the petition a report on the condition of the defendant. If the report indicates that the defendant remains incompetent, it shall include a prognosis regarding the likelihood that the defendant will become competent prior to the dismissal of the charges pursuant to subsection (j). Copies of the report shall be given to the attorney for the state and to the defendant or the defendant’s counsel.

Defendant’s right to petition. A defendant committed pursuant to subsection (i)(2) or (i)(3) may at any time petition the court to review the state of the defendant’s competency.

Hearing on petition. Upon receipt of a petition pursuant to subsection (k) or (l) and appropriate notice to the defendant, the state, and the director, the court shall hold a hearing at which the parties may introduce evidence as to the defendant’s competency, including any reports of the director, and the defendant may testify, confront witnesses, and present evidence as to the defendant’s competency and prognosis. On the basis of the evidence, the court shall make a finding as to the defendant’s competency and, if the defendant is found to be incompetent, whether a reasonable likelihood exists that the defendant will become competent prior to the dismissal of the charges pursuant to subsection (j). If the court finds that the defendant is competent, it shall enter an order to that effect. If the court finds that the defendant is incompetent and that a reasonable likelihood exists that the defendant will become competent prior to the dismissal of the charges pursuant to subsection (j), it shall order continuation of the commitment of the defendant. If the court finds that the defendant is incompetent and that a reasonable likelihood does not exist that the defendant will become competent prior to the dismissal of the charges pursuant to subsection (j), it shall order that thirty (30) days thereafter the defendant be discharged from detention under the order of commitment. Upon entry of the order, the state may commence proceedings seeking to commit the defendant pursuant to §

40.1-5-8

.

Statements inadmissible. No statements made by a defendant in the course of an examination conducted pursuant to subsection (d) or during a hearing conducted pursuant to subsection (i) or (m) shall be admissible in evidence against the defendant in any criminal action on any issue other than the defendant’s mental condition. The statements shall be admissible on the issue of the defendant’s mental condition even though they might otherwise be deemed to be privileged communications.

Disposition of charges. The court may, at any time, proceed to a disposition of the charges pending against a defendant who has been committed pursuant to subsection (i)(2) or (i)(3) if the factual and legal issues involved can be resolved without regard to the competency of the defendant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 175, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 203, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 261, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 26-4-3; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 140, § 1; 1989, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 57, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5.3-4.
Commitment of persons acquitted on ground of insanity.

Definitions. As used in this section:

“Court” means the court in which a defendant was adjudged not guilty of a criminal offense because he or she was insane at the time of its commission.

“Director” means the director of the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Likelihood of serious harm” means:

A substantial risk of physical harm to the person him or herself as manifested by behavior evidencing serious threats of or attempts at suicide or by behavior that will result in serious bodily harm; or

A substantial risk of physical harm to other persons as manifested by behavior or threats evidencing homicidal or other violent behavior.

“Mental disability” means a mental disorder in which the capacity of a person to exercise self control or judgment in the conduct of his or her affairs and social relations or to care for his or her own personal needs is significantly impaired.

Examination of person found not guilty. If a person is adjudged not guilty of a criminal offense because he or she was insane at the time of its commission, the court shall commit him or her to the custody of the director for the purpose of observation and examination to determine whether the person is dangerous.

Report of director.

Not later than twenty (20) days from the date of the order of commitment, the director shall prepare and file with the court a report, in writing, in which he or she shall state his or her opinion as to whether by reason of mental disability the person’s unsupervised presence in the community will create a likelihood of serious harm, together with the medical and other data upon which his or her opinion is based. A copy of the report shall be given to the attorney general and to the person, or his or her counsel.

In the event the director is unable to complete the examination of the person in time to render his or her report within the twenty-day (20) period, he or she shall report that fact, in writing, to the court with a statement of the reasons why the examination and report could not be completed within the prescribed period. A copy of the director’s statement shall be given to the attorney general and to the person, or his or her counsel, any of whom may respond in writing, or if the court deems it appropriate, orally, to the director’s statement. The court may thereupon enter an order, extending for an additional twenty (20) days the time in which the director is to file his or her report.

Hearing. Upon receipt of the report and appropriate notice to the director, the attorney general, and the person, or his or her counsel, the court shall hold a hearing at which the report shall be introduced, other evidence bearing on the question of the mental condition of the person may be introduced by the parties, and the person may testify, confront witnesses, and present evidence.

Commitment of person. If the court finds that the person is not dangerous, it shall order that he or she be discharged at once. If the court finds that the person is dangerous, it shall commit him or her to the custody of the director for care and treatment as an inpatient in a public institution. A person committed under this subsection shall not be paroled, furloughed, placed on outpatient status, or released from a locked facility or otherwise released from the institution where he or she is being treated except upon petition to the court by the director, on notice to the attorney general and the person, or his or her counsel, and entry of an order by a judge of the court authorizing the release.

Periodic review. The director shall petition the court to review the condition of a person committed pursuant to subsection (e) not later than six (6) months from the date of the order of commitment and every six (6) months thereafter, or when the director no longer believes that the unsupervised presence of the person in the community will create a likelihood of serious harm, whichever occurs first. The director shall attach to the petition a report on the condition of the person. Copies of the report shall be given to the attorney general and to the defendant, or his or her counsel.

Person’s right to petition. A person committed pursuant to subsection (e) may at any time petition the court to review his or her condition.

Hearing on petition. Upon receipt of a petition pursuant to subsection (f) or (g) and appropriate notice to the director, the attorney general, and the person, or his or her counsel, the court shall hold a hearing at which the parties may introduce evidence bearing on the mental condition of the person, including any reports of the director, and the person may testify, confront witnesses, and present evidence. If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that by reason of mental disability the presence of the person in the community will create a likelihood of serious harm, it shall enter an order to that effect and he or she shall remain in the custody of the director. If the court does not so find, it shall enter an order discharging the person from the custody of the director.

Transfer of nonresidents. In the case of a person who has been committed pursuant to subsection (e) and who is a resident of another state, the director, on notice to the attorney general and the person, or his or her counsel, may petition the court to transfer the person to the custody of officials of the state in which the person ordinarily resides. The court may, in its discretion, order the transfer of the person if it finds that appropriate officials of the state in which the person ordinarily resides are willing to accept custody of the person and provide care and treatment for him or her on such terms and conditions as the court deems to be necessary and proper to the peace and safety of the public and to the welfare of the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 175, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 203, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 261, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 26-4-4; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-5.3-5.
Expenses of examination.

All necessary expenses of an examination conducted under the provisions of §

40.1-5.3-3

or

40.1-5.3-4

shall be paid by the general treasurer, upon recommendation of the justice or judge who orders the examination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 175, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 26-4-5; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-5.3-6.
Examination of persons awaiting trial or convicted and imprisoned for crime.

On a petition of the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or on the petition of the director of the department of corrections, setting forth that any person awaiting trial or convicted of a crime and imprisoned for the crime in the adult correctional institutions is mentally ill and requires specialized mental health care and psychiatric in-patient services that cannot be provided in a correctional facility, a judge of the district court or justice of the superior court may order the examination of the person as in his or her discretion he or she shall deem appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 175, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 26-4-6; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 576, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 97; P.L. 2013, ch. 279, § 1.

40.1-5.3-7.
Hearing on petition.

Upon receipt of the petition and appropriate notice to the director, the attorney general, and the person, or his or her counsel, the court having jurisdiction over the case shall hold a hearing at which the parties may introduce evidence bearing on the mental condition of the person. The person who is the subject of the petition may testify, confront witnesses, and present evidence.

If the court having jurisdiction over the case finds by clear and convincing evidence that the person is mentally ill and requires specialized mental health care and psychiatric inpatient services that cannot be provided in a correctional facility, the court may order the transfer of the prisoner from the adult correctional institutions, to be detained in the facility provided for in §

40.1-5.3-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 175, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 26-4-7; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 576, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 97; P.L. 2013, ch. 279, § 1.

40.1-5.3-8.
Duration of order of transfer — Officer to whom directed.

An order of transfer entered pursuant to §

40.1-5.3-7

shall be for and during the term of the prisoner’s sentence, and shall be directed to the sheriff, or any of his or her deputies, of the county in which the prisoner stands committed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 175, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 26-4-8; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-5.3-9.
Return to confinement.

When any person transferred pursuant to §

40.1-5.3-7

has sufficiently recovered his or her mental health, he or she may, upon petition of the director and by order of a judge of the district court or justice of the superior court in his or her discretion, be transferred to the place of his or her original confinement, to serve out the remainder of his or her term of sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 175, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 26-4-9; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 576, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 97; P.L. 2013, ch. 279, § 1.

40.1-5.3-9.1.
Hearing on petition.

Upon receipt of the petition and appropriate notice to the attorney general and the person, or his or her counsel, the court having jurisdiction over the case shall hold a hearing at which the parties may introduce evidence bearing on the mental condition of the person. The person who is the subject of the petition may testify, confront witnesses, and present evidence.

If the court having jurisdiction over the case finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the person has sufficiently recovered his or her mental health, he or she shall, by order of the court having jurisdiction over the case in the court’s discretion, be transferred from the facility as provided for in §

40.1-5.3-1

to the place of his or her original confinement, to serve out the remainder of his or her term of sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 279, § 2.

40.1-5.3-10.
Expenses of examination.

All the necessary expenses of the examination conducted under §

40.1-5.3-6

shall be paid by the general treasurer, upon the recommendation of the justice who orders the examination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 175, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 26-4-10; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-5.3-11.
Liability for expenses of maintenance — Action for collection of expenses.

The estate of any prisoner transferred pursuant to §

40.1-5.3-7

to the facility provided for in §

40.1-5.3-1

shall be liable for the expense of his or her care and treatment therein. At the request of the fiscal agent of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the general treasurer, on behalf of the state, shall commence and prosecute to final judgment and execution any necessary and proper action, suit, or proceeding at law or in equity, against the estate of the prisoner for the collection of such expense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 274, § 1.

40.1-5.3-12.
Investigation of ability to pay for maintenance.

It shall be the duty of the fiscal agent to investigate all cases of prisoners transferred pursuant to §

40.1-5.3-7

to the facility provided for in §

40.1-5.3-1

to ascertain whether there is any estate belonging to the prisoners that may be applied to satisfy the liability established by §

40.1-5.3-1

1, and any bank or other custodian of the estate belonging to the prisoners shall be required to make discovery thereof upon written demand of the fiscal agent; provided, however, that any information so obtained shall not be disclosed, directly or indirectly, by the fiscal agent to any person except as necessary and proper to carry out the provisions of §

40.1-5.3-11

. The fiscal agent shall request that the general treasurer commence and prosecute an action, suit, or proceeding pursuant to §

40.1-5.3-11

whenever he or she determines that an action, suit, or proceeding is appropriate in light of the estate belonging to the prisoner sought to be charged. In determining the appropriateness of an action, suit, or proceeding, the fiscal agent shall consider the effect that execution against the estate would have upon the support and maintenance of those persons, if any, to whom the prisoner sought to be charged is liable for support.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 137.

40.1-5.3-13.
General rights.

Every person committed for care and treatment under the provisions of this chapter shall retain certain constitutional and civil rights. The exercise of these rights may be limited only for good cause, and any limitation must be promptly entered into the person’s record. These rights include, but are not limited, to the following:

To be visited privately by a personal physician, attorney, clergyperson, or the mental health advocate, and by other persons at all reasonable times;

To be provided with stationery, writing materials, and postage in reasonable amounts and to have free unrestricted, unopened, and uncensored use of the mail;

To wear one’s own clothes, keep and use personal possessions, have access to individual storage space for private use, and reasonable access to the telephone to make and receive confidential calls;

To seek independent examinations and opinions from a psychiatrist or mental health professional of his or her choice;

To receive and read literature;

To have access to the mental health advocate upon request;

Not to participate in experimentation in the absence of the person’s informed, written consent, or if incompetent, upon an order of substituted judgment;

To freedom from restraint or seclusion, except during an emergency;

To exercise the rights described in this section without reprisal, including reprisal in the form of denial of any appropriate and available treatment or any right or privilege;

To have an opportunity for exercise at least one hour each day.

For the purposes of this section, “emergency” is defined as an imminent threat of serious bodily harm to the patient or to others. A request for informed consent includes a reasonable explanation of the procedure to be followed, the benefits to be expected, the relative advantages of alternative treatments, the potential discomforts and risks, and the right and opportunity to revoke the consent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 281, § 1.

40.1-5.3-14.
Right to treatment — Treatment plan.

Any person who has been committed or transferred to a facility for care and treatment pursuant to this chapter shall have a right to receive the care and treatment that is necessary for and appropriate to the condition for which he or she was committed or transferred and from which he or she can reasonably be expected to benefit. Each person shall have an individualized treatment plan. This plan shall be developed by appropriate mental health professionals, including a psychiatrist. Each plan must be developed within ten (10) days of a person’s admission to a facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 281, § 1.

40.1-5.3-15.
Disclosure of confidential information and records.

Information or records compiled or obtained for the purposes of a person’s health care shall remain confidential and may be disclosed only as required for court proceedings or as provided under the provisions of chapter 5 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 281, § 1.

40.1-5.3-16.
Disclosure of rights.

A person committed to a facility pursuant to this chapter shall be informed, in writing, of his or her rights upon admission. Copies of statements describing the rights shall be prominently posted in all facilities in which the persons are detained.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 281, § 1.

40.1-5.3-17.
Penalties for deprivation of rights — Disciplinary action — Duty to report.

Any person who willfully withholds from or denies to a person committed to a facility pursuant to this chapter any of his or her rights as herein granted, shall, on conviction thereof, be fined not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years.

Any employee of a facility who shall deny to or withhold from any person any right granted him or her by this chapter shall, independently of the above criminal sanctions, be subject to such disciplinary action as the officer in charge shall see fit to impose, after notice, a hearing, and a finding of a violation of the right.

Any employee who has reasonable cause to believe that an assault or a battery has been committed upon a committed person shall make an immediate report, including the identity of parties and witnesses and details of the incident, to the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals or his or her designee. The director of the department shall cause the report to be investigated immediately and further shall notify the mental health advocate and appropriate law enforcement agencies of the results of the investigation. Any person who fails to make such a report shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 254, § 5; P.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 5.

40.1-5.3-18.
Applicability.

The rights and protections contained in §§

40.1-5.3-13

,

40.1-5.3-15

,

40.1-5.3-16

, and

40.1-5.3-17

shall apply to all persons admitted, committed, or transferred to a facility pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 281, § 1.